Hawaii statutes.
§846E-7 Notification by the attorney
general of changes in registration information. Immediately, and in no
event, not later than ten days after receiving notice of a change of
registration information, the attorney general shall report the change of registration
information by a covered offender required to register under this chapter to
the county police department where the covered offender is residing and, in the
event the covered offender changes address to another county or state, shall
report such change of address to the Federal Bureau of Investigation. If the
person changes residence to another state, the attorney general also shall
notify the law enforcement agency with which the person must register in the
new state, if the new state has a registration requirement. [L 1997, c 316, pt
of §2; am L 1998, c 194, §9; am L 2005, c 45, §9]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next